Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-625
Implement of husbandry, defined.

Implement of husbandry shall mean every vehicle or implement designed and adapted exclusively for agricultural, horticultural, or livestock-raising operations or for lifting or carrying an implement of husbandry and used primarily off any highway.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 121;

Laws 2000, LB 1361, § 1.